District of Columbia statutes.
31-1373.06

Equity interests.

(a)

Subject to the limitations of § 31-1373.03, an insurer may acquire equity interests in business entities organized under the laws of any domestic jurisdiction.

(b)

An insurer shall not acquire an investment under this section if, as a result of and after giving effect to the investment, the aggregate amount of investments held by the insurer under this section would exceed the greater of 25% of its admitted assets or 100% of its surplus as regards policyholders.

(c)

An insurer shall not acquire under this section any investments that the insurer may acquire under § 31-1373.08.

(d)

An insurer shall not short sell equity investments unless the insurer covers the short sale by owning the equity investment or an unrestricted right to the equity instrument exercisable within 6 months of the short sale.

History

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 306, 50 DCR 330

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-1372.05 and § 31-1373.02.